Utah statutes.
16-6a-114.   Penalty for signing false documents.

(1)  It is unlawful for a person to sign a document:

(a)  knowing it to be false in any material respect; and

(b)  with intent that the document be delivered to the division for filing.

(2)  An offense under this section is a class A misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed the fine specified in Section 76-3-301.

